District of Columbia statutes.
7-1208.04

Prohibition against waiver.

Any consent or agreement purporting to waive the provisions of this chapter is hereby declared to be against public policy and void.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-136, § 804, 25 DCR 5055

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-2074.
1973 Ed., § 6-1646.